WebApplication17/ckDil/server/dictionaries/tr.aff
FLAG num
SFX 1183 N 1
SFX 1183 0 daydım .
SFX 1185 N 1
SFX 1185 0 ılmaya .
SFX 1186 N 1
SFX 1186 0 cüler .
SFX 1187 N 1
SFX 1187 0 eceklerin .
SFX 1188 N 1
SFX 1188 0 layabilirsiniz .
SFX 1190 N 1
SFX 1190 0 mamalı .
SFX 1189 N 1
SFX 1189 0 nmışa .
SFX 1191 N 1
SFX 1191 0 ciden .
SFX 1192 N 1
SFX 1192 0 yamayacaklar .
SFX 1193 N 1
SFX 1193 0 malarının .
SFX 1194 N 1
SFX 1194 0 direceklerini .
SFX 1195 N 1
SFX 1195 0 amayan .
SFX 1196 N 1
SFX 1196 0 cilerle .
SFX 1197 N 1
SFX 1197 0 mışlarsa .
SFX 1198 N 1
SFX 1198 0 larımı .
SFX 1200 N 1
SFX 1200 0 imizle .
SFX 1199 N 1
SFX 1199 0 layamayız .
SFX 1203 N 1
SFX 1203 0 sunun .
SFX 1202 N 1
SFX 1202 0 üşü .
SFX 1201 N 1
SFX 1201 0 ndırma .
SFX 1205 N 1
SFX 1205 0 laşmama .
SFX 1204 N 1
SFX 1204 0 ılmışlardır .
SFX 1206 N 1
SFX 1206 0 mamaktan .
SFX 1207 N 1
SFX 1207 0 leşmesidir .
SFX 1208 N 1
SFX 1208 0 landıran .
SFX 1209 N 1
SFX 1209 0 anla .
SFX 1210 N 1
SFX 1210 0 lerimizle .
SFX 1211 N 1
SFX 1211 0 duğu .
SFX 1213 N 1
SFX 1213 0 tan .
SFX 1212 N 1
SFX 1212 0 ıcı .
SFX 1214 N 1
SFX 1214 0 sunuz .
SFX 1216 N 1
SFX 1216 0 ın .
SFX 1215 N 1
SFX 1215 0 ıla .
SFX 1218 N 1
SFX 1218 0 ım .
SFX 1217 N 1
SFX 1217 0 leşirse .
SFX 1219 N 1
SFX 1219 0 ıp .
SFX 1221 N 1
SFX 1221 0 ılamadığına .
SFX 1220 N 1
SFX 1220 0 müşüz .
SFX 1222 N 1
SFX 1222 0 lerimizin .
SFX 1223 N 1
SFX 1223 0 ık .
SFX 1224 N 1
SFX 1224 0 ınınsa .
SFX 1225 N 1
SFX 1225 0 medikçe .
SFX 1226 N 1
SFX 1226 0 müşüm .
SFX 1227 N 1
SFX 1227 0 leştiriyorlar .
SFX 1228 N 1
SFX 1228 0 lanacakları .
SFX 1229 N 1
SFX 1229 0 laşabileceği .
SFX 1230 N 1
SFX 1230 0 mazmış .
SFX 1231 N 1
SFX 1231 0 nmamıştı .
SFX 1232 N 1
SFX 1232 0 leştirmişti .
SFX 1233 N 1
SFX 1233 0 tıcılığı .
SFX 1235 N 1
SFX 1235 0 indeydi .
SFX 1234 N 1
SFX 1234 0 ebileceği .
SFX 1236 N 1
SFX 1236 0 lığa .
SFX 1237 N 1
SFX 1237 0 cilerden .
SFX 1238 N 1
SFX 1238 0 lenince .
SFX 1239 N 1
SFX 1239 0 cadan .
SFX 1240 N 1
SFX 1240 0 laştırdığı .
SFX 1242 N 1
SFX 1242 0 mayalım .
SFX 1241 N 1
SFX 1241 0 ilmemelidir .
SFX 1243 N 1
SFX 1243 0 laştırırken .
SFX 1245 N 1
SFX 1245 0 leştirildiği .
SFX 1244 N 1
SFX 1244 0 ız .
SFX 1246 N 1
SFX 1246 0 lenebildiğini .
SFX 1247 N 1
SFX 1247 0 iliyor .
SFX 1249 N 1
SFX 1249 0 ır .
SFX 1248 N 1
SFX 1248 0 suzluğun .
SFX 1250 N 1
SFX 1250 0 lenmezse .
SFX 1253 N 1
SFX 1253 0 mekten .
SFX 1252 N 1
SFX 1252 0 latma .
SFX 1251 N 1
SFX 1251 0 layamamanın .
SFX 1254 N 1
SFX 1254 0 iminden .
SFX 1255 N 1
SFX 1255 0 abileceğin .
SFX 1256 N 1
SFX 1256 0 abileceğim .
SFX 1257 N 1
SFX 1257 0 ına .
SFX 1260 N 1
SFX 1260 0 amayanların .
SFX 1259 N 1
SFX 1259 0 sizlikleri .
SFX 1258 N 1
SFX 1258 0 duklarına .
SFX 1261 N 1
SFX 1261 0 lettiğini .
SFX 1262 N 1
SFX 1262 0 terek .
SFX 1263 N 1
SFX 1263 0 latıldığı .
SFX 1264 N 1
SFX 1264 0 diğimizi .
SFX 1265 N 1
SFX 1265 0 ündekilerin .
SFX 1266 N 1
SFX 1266 0 dirildiğini .
SFX 1268 N 1
SFX 1268 0 imizin .
SFX 1267 N 1
SFX 1267 0 lamayacağım .
SFX 1270 N 1
SFX 1270 0 leştiremediği .
SFX 1269 N 1
SFX 1269 0 yışlarını .
SFX 1272 N 1
SFX 1272 0 lamalıdır .
SFX 1271 N 1
SFX 1271 0 nabileceğinden .
SFX 1273 N 1
SFX 1273 0 şmeye .
SFX 1274 N 1
SFX 1274 0 abilmeniz .
SFX 1275 N 1
SFX 1275 0 ıma .
SFX 1276 N 1
SFX 1276 0 lenemediğini .
SFX 1278 N 1
SFX 1278 0 ımdan .
SFX 1277 N 1
SFX 1277 0 yenlerin .
SFX 1279 N 1
SFX 1279 0 nizi .
SFX 1280 N 1
SFX 1280 0 ıyorlar .
SFX 1281 N 1
SFX 1281 0 ciliğe .
SFX 1282 N 1
SFX 1282 0 eceklerdi .
SFX 1283 N 1
SFX 1283 0 lığı .
SFX 1286 N 1
SFX 1286 0 ciliği .
SFX 1285 N 1
SFX 1285 0 lüklerin .
SFX 1284 N 1
SFX 1284 0 miyordu .
SFX 1287 N 1
SFX 1287 0 nize .
SFX 1288 N 1
SFX 1288 0 landırdığına .
SFX 1289 N 1
SFX 1289 0 emeyeceğim .
SFX 1290 N 1
SFX 1290 0 larımızı .
SFX 1291 N 1
SFX 1291 0 'nınki .
SFX 1292 N 1
SFX 1292 0 yıcılığından .
SFX 1295 N 1
SFX 1295 0 larındaydı .
SFX 1294 N 1
SFX 1294 0 landıklarında .
SFX 1293 N 1
SFX 1293 0 nmesine .
SFX 1297 N 1
SFX 1297 0 yamamıştı .
SFX 1296 N 1
SFX 1296 0 ulmasın .
SFX 1300 N 1
SFX 1300 0 yamadığını .
SFX 1299 N 1
SFX 1299 0 leyebilecek .
SFX 1298 N 1
SFX 1298 0 nmesini .
SFX 1301 N 1
SFX 1301 0 nmalarına .
SFX 1303 N 1
SFX 1303 0 yabildikleri .
SFX 1302 N 1
SFX 1302 0 nından .
SFX 1304 N 1
SFX 1304 0 çuları .
SFX 1305 N 1
SFX 1305 0 ndaki .
SFX 1306 N 1
SFX 1306 0 enlerinden .
SFX 1307 N 1
SFX 1307 0 tiklerinde .
SFX 1309 N 1
SFX 1309 0 cilerin .
SFX 1308 N 1
SFX 1308 0 sıymış .
SFX 1311 N 1
SFX 1311 0 lanmalıdır .
SFX 1310 N 1
SFX 1310 0 imizdeki .
SFX 1313 N 1
SFX 1313 0 laşıyoruz .
SFX 1312 N 1
SFX 1312 0 lenmeyeceğini .
SFX 1315 N 1
SFX 1315 0 laşsa .
SFX 1314 N 1
SFX 1314 0 meci .
SFX 1316 N 1
SFX 1316 0 leştirebileceğini .
SFX 1318 N 1
SFX 1318 0 inizle .
SFX 1317 N 1
SFX 1317 0 ılması .
SFX 1319 N 1
SFX 1319 0 meyecekti .
SFX 1321 N 1
SFX 1321 0 dırmadan .
SFX 1320 N 1
SFX 1320 0 ıldıktan .
SFX 1324 N 1
SFX 1324 0 mış .
SFX 1323 N 1
SFX 1323 0 abilirdi .
SFX 1322 N 1
SFX 1322 0 lardaydı .
SFX 1325 N 1
SFX 1325 0 lıktaydı .
SFX 1326 N 1
SFX 1326 0 ışı .
SFX 1327 N 1
SFX 1327 0 laştırılması .
SFX 1328 N 1
SFX 1328 0 laştırılmaya .
SFX 1330 N 1
SFX 1330 0 laştıracağı .
SFX 1329 N 1
SFX 1329 0 lamasıyla .
SFX 1331 N 1
SFX 1331 0 lanmayan .
SFX 1333 N 1
SFX 1333 0 lamalarında .
SFX 1332 N 1
SFX 1332 0 lenmenin .
SFX 1334 N 1
SFX 1334 0 nemediğini .
SFX 1335 N 1
SFX 1335 0 ememesinden .
SFX 1336 N 1
SFX 1336 0 landırıldığına .
SFX 1337 N 1
SFX 1337 0 'ını .
SFX 1338 N 1
SFX 1338 0 iminin .
SFX 1341 N 1
SFX 1341 0 cılığına .
SFX 1340 N 1
SFX 1340 0 nebileceğini .
SFX 1339 N 1
SFX 1339 0 çılığın .
SFX 1342 N 1
SFX 1342 0 yacaklarına .
SFX 1344 N 1
SFX 1344 0 nebileceğine .
SFX 1343 N 1
SFX 1343 0 cıklar .
SFX 1345 N 1
SFX 1345 0 cılığa .
SFX 1346 N 1
SFX 1346 0 sudur .
SFX 1347 N 1
SFX 1347 0 lığınız .
SFX 1348 N 1
SFX 1348 0 şa .
SFX 1349 N 1
SFX 1349 0 abilse .
SFX 1350 N 1
SFX 1350 0 mıyorlar .
SFX 1351 N 1
SFX 1351 0 'ninki .
SFX 1352 N 1
SFX 1352 0 ilenleri .
SFX 1353 N 1
SFX 1353 0 malısın .
SFX 1354 N 1
SFX 1354 0 luklarında .
SFX 1355 N 1
SFX 1355 0 unuza .
SFX 1356 N 1
SFX 1356 0 lemez .
SFX 1357 N 1
SFX 1357 0 yecektir .
SFX 1358 N 1
SFX 1358 0 selliğin .
SFX 1359 N 1
SFX 1359 0 unuzu .
SFX 1360 N 1
SFX 1360 0 yemedik .
SFX 1361 N 1
SFX 1361 0 niyor .
SFX 1366 N 1
SFX 1366 0 lılarının .
SFX 1365 N 1
SFX 1365 0 üyor .
SFX 1364 N 1
SFX 1364 0 lemem .
SFX 1363 N 1
SFX 1363 0 lendirdikleri .
SFX 1362 N 1
SFX 1362 0 namazdı .
SFX 1367 N 1
SFX 1367 0 lemek .
SFX 1368 N 1
SFX 1368 0 malarından .
SFX 1369 N 1
SFX 1369 0 tacağına .
SFX 1371 N 1
SFX 1371 0 laşmasına .
SFX 1370 N 1
SFX 1370 0 indesiniz .
SFX 1372 N 1
SFX 1372 0 ılacağı .
SFX 1374 N 1
SFX 1374 0 lanmamış .
SFX 1373 N 1
SFX 1373 0 ttığına .
SFX 1375 N 1
SFX 1375 0 ilmeyeceği .
SFX 1376 N 1
SFX 1376 0 cüleri .
SFX 1378 N 1
SFX 1378 0 abilmeleri .
SFX 1377 N 1
SFX 1377 0 mekti .
SFX 1379 N 1
SFX 1379 0 meyecekleri .
SFX 1380 N 1
SFX 1380 0 duğunu .
SFX 1381 N 1
SFX 1381 0 layışı .
SFX 1382 N 1
SFX 1382 0 tılınca .
SFX 1383 N 1
SFX 1383 0 leyebileceklerini .
SFX 1384 N 1
SFX 1384 0 larsınız .
SFX 1385 N 1
SFX 1385 0 leyelim .
SFX 1386 N 1
SFX 1386 0 mekte .
SFX 1388 N 1
SFX 1388 0 leştiriyor .
SFX 1387 N 1
SFX 1387 0 leştikleri .
SFX 1389 N 1
SFX 1389 0 ndirdiği .
SFX 1390 N 1
SFX 1390 0 laştırıyoruz .
SFX 1391 N 1
SFX 1391 0 teki .
SFX 1392 N 1
SFX 1392 0 şmak .
SFX 1393 N 1
SFX 1393 0 dirmeli .
SFX 1395 N 1
SFX 1395 0 lerimizdir .
SFX 1394 N 1
SFX 1394 0 dirmeden .
SFX 1396 N 1
SFX 1396 0 tığınız .
SFX 1397 N 1
SFX 1397 0 layın .
SFX 1398 N 1
SFX 1398 0 layıp .
SFX 1399 N 1
SFX 1399 0 ırmış .
SFX 1400 N 1
SFX 1400 0 ştırdığı .
SFX 1401 N 1
SFX 1401 0 diğindeyse .
SFX 1402 N 1
SFX 1402 0 layış .
SFX 1403 N 1
SFX 1403 0 yamamanın .
SFX 1405 N 1
SFX 1405 0 leyemediği .
SFX 1404 N 1
SFX 1404 0 yebilir .
SFX 1409 N 1
SFX 1409 0 yacağınız .
SFX 1408 N 1
SFX 1408 0 dirdiklerini .
SFX 1407 N 1
SFX 1407 0 mamalısınız .
SFX 1406 N 1
SFX 1406 0 layamazsınız .
SFX 1411 N 1
SFX 1411 0 yacağının .
SFX 1410 N 1
SFX 1410 0 laştıracağından .
SFX 1412 N 1
SFX 1412 0 ersin .
SFX 1413 N 1
SFX 1413 0 dırma .
SFX 1415 N 1
SFX 1415 0 ıyız .
SFX 1414 N 1
SFX 1414 0 liliğinden .
SFX 1416 N 1
SFX 1416 0 meseydi .
SFX 1417 N 1
SFX 1417 0 lığındandır .
SFX 1418 N 1
SFX 1418 0 amayacaklarından .
SFX 1419 N 1
SFX 1419 0 yemeyen .
SFX 1420 N 1
SFX 1420 0 indense .
SFX 1421 N 1
SFX 1421 0 duğuna .
SFX 1422 N 1
SFX 1422 0 laşmalar .
SFX 1423 N 1
SFX 1423 0 ılacakları .
SFX 1425 N 1
SFX 1425 0 tıracaklarını .
SFX 1424 N 1
SFX 1424 0 mekse .
SFX 1427 N 1
SFX 1427 0 ıyım .
SFX 1426 N 1
SFX 1426 0 nmasıyla .
SFX 1428 N 1
SFX 1428 0 lüklerinden .
SFX 1429 N 1
SFX 1429 0 laştık .
SFX 1430 N 1
SFX 1430 0 ildi .
SFX 1431 N 1
SFX 1431 0 laştım .
SFX 1432 N 1
SFX 1432 0 lenirse .
SFX 1433 N 1
SFX 1433 0 mızın .
SFX 1434 N 1
SFX 1434 0 lerinden .
SFX 1435 N 1
SFX 1435 0 iyorlar .
SFX 1437 N 1
SFX 1437 0 lamakla .
SFX 1436 N 1
SFX 1436 0 amayarak .
SFX 1438 N 1
SFX 1438 0 latmışlar .
SFX 1440 N 1
SFX 1440 0 sizlerin .
SFX 1439 N 1
SFX 1439 0 ılmayı .
SFX 1441 N 1
SFX 1441 0 tırlar .
SFX 1443 N 1
SFX 1443 0 cıdan .
SFX 1442 N 1
SFX 1442 0 anlarında .
SFX 1444 N 1
SFX 1444 0 lerimizde .
SFX 1446 N 1
SFX 1446 0 ilmesin .
SFX 1445 N 1
SFX 1445 0 dirilmiş .
SFX 1447 N 1
SFX 1447 0 ememiştir .
SFX 1448 N 1
SFX 1448 0 madıktan .
SFX 1449 N 1
SFX 1449 0 layabileceğinden .
SFX 1450 N 1
SFX 1450 0 lığıdır .
SFX 1451 N 1
SFX 1451 0 üyle .
SFX 1452 N 1
SFX 1452 0 ışmış .
SFX 1453 N 1
SFX 1453 0 landırıldığı .
SFX 1454 N 1
SFX 1454 0 ttığından .
SFX 1457 N 1
SFX 1457 0 tıklarına .
SFX 1456 N 1
SFX 1456 0 ırsınız .
SFX 1455 N 1
SFX 1455 0 şan .
SFX 1458 N 1
SFX 1458 0 işler .
SFX 1459 N 1
SFX 1459 0 lemiştir .
SFX 1460 N 1
SFX 1460 0 laşmamış .
SFX 1462 N 1
SFX 1462 0 layamadığını .
SFX 1461 N 1
SFX 1461 0 yamayacaktır .
SFX 1463 N 1
SFX 1463 0 lenmesin .
SFX 1464 N 1
SFX 1464 0 cuları .
SFX 1465 N 1
SFX 1465 0 nmadık .
SFX 1466 N 1
SFX 1466 0 nana .
SFX 1467 N 1
SFX 1467 0 mışımdır .
SFX 1468 N 1
SFX 1468 0 eceklerinden .
SFX 1469 N 1
SFX 1469 0 lerimizden .
SFX 1471 N 1
SFX 1471 0 abilirsiniz .
SFX 1470 N 1
SFX 1470 0 amayacağımızı .
SFX 1472 N 1
SFX 1472 0 lemediğinden .
SFX 1473 N 1
SFX 1473 0 'ına .
SFX 1474 N 1
SFX 1474 0 leştirilmesinde .
SFX 1475 N 1
SFX 1475 0 mediğine .
SFX 1476 N 1
SFX 1476 0 elim .
SFX 1477 N 1
SFX 1477 0 cıdır .
SFX 1478 N 1
SFX 1478 0 lemişler .
SFX 1479 N 1
SFX 1479 0 sızlığına .
SFX 1480 N 1
SFX 1480 0 ulduklarını .
SFX 1481 N 1
SFX 1481 0 dıklarıyla .
SFX 1482 N 1
SFX 1482 0 lükler .
SFX 1483 N 1
SFX 1483 0 ememesine .
SFX 1484 N 1
SFX 1484 0 ıyı .
SFX 1485 N 1
SFX 1485 0 sındadır .
SFX 1486 N 1
SFX 1486 0 mediğimi .
SFX 1487 N 1
SFX 1487 0 üydü .
SFX 1488 N 1
SFX 1488 0 emediğim .
SFX 1489 N 1
SFX 1489 0 ılamamıştır .
SFX 1490 N 1
SFX 1490 0 emediğin .
SFX 1494 N 1
SFX 1494 0 lanan .
SFX 1493 N 1
SFX 1493 0 cilikten .
SFX 1492 N 1
SFX 1492 0 landırılacak .
SFX 1491 N 1
SFX 1491 0 laştırılmak .
SFX 1495 N 1
SFX 1495 0 neceklerini .
SFX 1496 N 1
SFX 1496 0 ememişler .
SFX 1497 N 1
SFX 1497 0 irler .
SFX 1498 N 1
SFX 1498 0 ıcılığın .
SFX 1499 N 1
SFX 1499 0 lanacağı .
SFX 1500 N 1
SFX 1500 0 işinde .
SFX 1501 N 1
SFX 1501 0 nanı .
SFX 1502 N 1
SFX 1502 0 mezliğini .
SFX 1503 N 1
SFX 1503 0 mezliğine .
SFX 1505 N 1
SFX 1505 0 yanlar .
SFX 1504 N 1
SFX 1504 0 ebilmesi .
SFX 1507 N 1
SFX 1507 0 anlara .
SFX 1506 N 1
SFX 1506 0 lüğe .
SFX 1508 N 1
SFX 1508 0 sinin .
SFX 1509 N 1
SFX 1509 0 tmek .
SFX 1511 N 1
SFX 1511 0 mekle .
SFX 1510 N 1
SFX 1510 0 ilen .
SFX 1512 N 1
SFX 1512 0 çiler .
SFX 1513 N 1
SFX 1513 0 lükten .
SFX 1515 N 1
SFX 1515 0 nmişlerdi .
SFX 1514 N 1
SFX 1514 0 tılamadığından .
SFX 1517 N 1
SFX 1517 0 lamazlar .
SFX 1516 N 1
SFX 1516 0 yemeyiz .
SFX 1518 N 1
SFX 1518 0 mışızdır .
SFX 1519 N 1
SFX 1519 0 cağız .
SFX 1520 N 1
SFX 1520 0 neceğinin .
SFX 1521 N 1
SFX 1521 0 ulmaları .
SFX 1523 N 1
SFX 1523 0 iler .
SFX 1522 N 1
SFX 1522 0 amamalı .
SFX 1524 N 1
SFX 1524 0 cilikle .
SFX 1526 N 1
SFX 1526 0 abilirse .
SFX 1525 N 1
SFX 1525 0 lendirilmelidir .
SFX 1528 N 1
SFX 1528 0 leşemediğini .
